Missouri, session 2026, HB3373.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.2541, to read as follows:
173.2541. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Homeless pupils", includes any person who satisfies the definition of
"homeless children and youths" established in 42 U.S.C. Section 11434a(2) and any
person who satisfies the definition of "unaccompanied youth" established in 42 U.S.C.
Section 11434a(6);
(2) "Liaison", the liaison for postsecondary education for homeless pupils
established in this section.
2. There is hereby established the liaison for postsecondary education for
homeless pupils within the department of higher education and workforce development.
3. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Liaison for Postsecondary
Education for Homeless Pupils Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by
the general assembly or any gifts, donations, or bequests for the purpose of
implementing the provisions of this section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund, and moneys in the fund
shall be used solely by the department of higher education and workforce development
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3373 2
for the purposes of implementing the provisions of this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the
end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the
fund.
4. The department of higher education and workforce development shall employ
a liaison for the purpose of implementing this section. The individual appointed:
(1) Shall be knowledgeable in the various issues relating to homeless pupils
including, but not limited to, the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, 42
U.S.C. Section 11431 et seq.; and
(2) Shall be independent of and have no pecuniary interest in any other
organization or entity that provides services to homeless pupils.
5. Subject to appropriations, the liaison shall:
(1) Conduct an annual analysis of homeless pupils in this state to assess the needs
of such pupils;
(2) Develop a database to track, monitor, and analyze trends in the rates of
graduation and retention of homeless pupils;
(3) Develop a model for college and career readiness for homeless pupils;
(4) Collaborate with high school staff members responsible for assisting
homeless and unaccompanied pupils;
(5) Collaborate with high schools to identify homeless pupils to refer such pupils
to appropriate support services after the admission of such pupils to an institution of
higher education within this state;
(6) Establish connections between and collaborate with financial aid offices,
student support services, and campus housing services of institutions of higher
education within this state;
(7) Identify and refer homeless pupils to mentoring programs;
(8) Increase awareness among teachers, instructors, professors, and other staff
members of institutions of higher education in this state who work with pupils on issues
relating to homeless pupils including, without limitation, identifying such pupils and
referring such pupils to appropriate resources;
(9) Establish and maintain a database of food banks, clothing banks, and low-
cost health care providers, to be provided, without limitation, to financial aid offices and
student support services of institutions of higher education;
(10) Identify and coordinate with food banks and clothing banks within this state
to provide services to homeless pupils; and

HB 3373 3
(11) Establish and publish a searchable directory of each institution of higher
education's designated homeless and foster student liaison, which shall be accessible to
the public and updated annually.
✔